District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
be cited as the “Parkside Support Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 104a of the Urban Forest Preservation Act of 2022, effective July 1, 2016 (D.C.
Law 21-133; D.C. Official Code § 8-651.04a), is amended by adding a new subsection (e) to
read as follows:
“(e) This section shall not apply to a Heritage Tree located in Lots 865, 866, 867, 868, or
869 in Square 5056 for which the Zoning Commission has approved a first-stage planned unit
development prior to July 1, 2016.”.
Sec. 3. Chapter 46 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by striking the phrase “47-4658. Lot 72, Square
5041 and Lot 811, Square 5056.” and inserting the phrase “47-4658. Parkside.” in its place.
(b) Section 47-4658 is amended to read as follows:
“§ 47-4658. Parkside.
“(a)(1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the real property described as Lots 865,
866, 867, 868, and 869 in Square 5056 shall be allowed an annual real property tax abatement

equal to the amount of the real property taxes assessed and imposed by Chapter 8 of this title of
up to a total maximum amount for each lot of $300,000 per year for 30 real property tax years
commencing at the beginning of the first month following the date that specific lot is issued a final
certificate of occupancy (“commencement date”) and ending for each lot at the end of the 30th full
real property tax year following the lot’s commencement date.
“(2) The real property tax abatement authorized by this subsection shall expire for
the lot, or lots, whichever the case may be, that has not been issued a final certificate of
occupancy by September 30, 2029, and an abatement pursuant to this subsection shall not
be allowed.
“(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and provided that the final
certificate of occupancy is issued on or before September 30, 2029, upon the issuance of a
final certificate for Lots 865, 866, 867, 868, and 869 in Square 5056, any fees or deposits
charged to and paid by the owner of that specific lot for the development of Lots 865, 866,
867, 868, and 869 in Square 5056, including private space or building permit fees or public
space permit fees (“related fees”), shall be refunded and any prospective related fees
forgiven.
“(4) The tax abatements and the exemptions from fees and deposits provided
pursuant to this subsection shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other tax relief or
assistance from any other source applicable to the development of Lots 865, 866, 867, 868,
and 869 in Square 5056.
“(b)(1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the real property described as Parcel 9A and
Parcel 9B shall be allowed an annual real property tax abatement equal to the amount of the real
property taxes assessed and imposed by Chapter 8 of this title of up to a total maximum amount
for each parcel of $300,000 per year for 30 real property tax years commencing at the beginning
of the first month following the date that the specific parcel is issued a final certificate of
occupancy ("commencement date") and ending for each parcel at the end of the 30th full real
property tax year following the parcel’s commencement date.
“(2) The real property tax abatement authorized by this subsection shall expire for the parcel, or
parcels, whichever the case may be, that has not been issued a final certificate of occupancy by
September 30, 2029.

“(3) The tax abatements provided pursuant to this subsection shall be in addition to, and not in
lieu of, any other tax relief or assistance from any other source applicable to the development of
Parcel 9A and Parcel 9B.
“(4) For purposes of this subsection, the term:
“(A) “Parcel 9A” means Lots 865, 866, and 867, in Square 5056 and any improvements
thereon.
“(B) “Parcel 9B” means Lots 868 and 869 in Square 5056 and any improvements
thereon.

Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor,
action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as provided
in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973
(87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of Columbia
Register.